Hawaii, session 2026, HB1907.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The city and county of Honolulu shall transfer to the State the city and county of Honolulu's authority to construct a new roadway extending Makakilo drive to Kualakai parkway. SECTION 2. All appropriations, records, equipment, machines, files, supplies, contracts, books, papers, documents, maps, other personal property, or real property heretofore made, used, acquired, or held by the city and county of Honolulu relating to the functions transferred to the department of transportation shall be transferred with the functions to which they relate. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to be deposited into the state highway fund. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the state highway fund the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for planning and construction of a new roadway extending Makakilo drive to Kualakai parkway. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of transportation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________